North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
North Carolina Commentary

This revision of the North Carolina Business Corporation Act is based upon the Revised Model Business Corporation Act (1984) (hereinafter “the Model Act”). To maintain uniformity, the numbering of the sections corresponds to that of the Model Act, except that the General Statutes Chapter 55 number has been added to each section and the Model Act chapters have been changed to articles.

Two types of comments appear. Under the designation “Official Comment” is the Official Comment of the Section of Corporation, Banking and Business Law of the American Bar Association for that section. Under the designation “North Carolina Comment” are the comments of the drafters who adapted the Model Act for enactment in North Carolina. The North Carolina comments are designed to note (1) deviations from the Model Act and (2) some significant changes from the former law. Some sections therefore do not have a North Carolina Comment.